Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1644.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part III of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 58AREPRODUCTIVE HEALTH SERVICESADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITYSec.58A01. Scope of chapter.58A02. Definitions.58A03. Establishment and administration of program.58A04. Eligibility to apply for program participation.58A05. Application and certification process.1234567891011121314151617 58A06. Cancellation, expiration and voluntary withdrawal of certifications.58A07. Acceptance of substitute addresses by State and local government entities.58A08. Disclosure of actual addresses.58A09. Waiver process.58A10. Emergency disclosure.58A11. Penalties.58A12. Civil immunity.58A13. Guidelines and regulations.§ 58A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to reproductive health services address confidentiality.§ 58A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Actual address." A residential address, school address or work address of an individual."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible person." A person specified under section 58A04 (relating to eligibility to apply for program participation)."Law enforcement agency." A municipal police department, the Pennsylvania State Police, a district attorney's office or the Office of Attorney General."Program." The Reproductive Health Services Address Confidentiality Program established under section 58A03 (relating to establishment and administration of program)."Program participant." A person certified by the department as eligible to participate in the program.20250HB1644PN1994 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Reproductive health service provider." A public or private hospital, clinic, center, medical school, medical training institution, health care facility, physician's office, infirmary, dispensary, ambulatory surgical treatment center or other institution or location that provides reproductive health services, including an employee, volunteer or contractor of the provider of the reproductive health services."Reproductive health services." Medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of pregnancy."Substitute address." The official address of the department or a confidential address designated by the department.§ 58A03. Establishment and administration of program.(a) Establishment.--The Reproductive Health Services Address Confidentiality Program is established within the department. Upon filing an application and certification by the department under section 58A05 (relating to application and certification process), a program participant shall receive a confidential substitute address provided by the department, which shall utilize a post office box number.(b) Administration.--The department shall forward all of a program participant's first class, registered and certified mail to the program participant at no expense to the program participant within three business days of receipt of the mail. The department may arrange to receive and forward other classes or kinds of the program participant's mail at the program participant's expense.(c) Notice.--Upon certification by the department under section 58A05(b), the department shall provide a notice of 20250HB1644PN1994 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participation and the program participant's substitute address to appropriate officials involved in an ongoing civil or criminal case in which the program participant is a victim, witness, plaintiff or defendant.(d) Records.--All records relating to an eligible person who submits an application under section 58A05(a) or a program participant shall be the property of the department. The department shall keep the records confidential, including a record relating to an application filed under section 58A05(a), a program participant's actual address or a waiver process under section 58A09 (relating to waiver process), and shall not be subject to access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, except to a law enforcement agency as necessary for the prosecution of an offense under section 58A11 (relating to penalties).§ 58A04. Eligibility to apply for program participation.Any of following may submit an application to the department to become a program participant:(1) A reproductive health service provider or a patient of the reproductive health service provider who files an affidavit with the department stating that the affiant fears a future violent act by the affiant's assailant, including a description of the assailant's violent act or threatened violent act toward the affiant, or that the affiant fears a violent act from another individual.(2) A person who is a member of the same household as a program participant.(3) A program participant who notifies the department of the program participant's intent to continue in the program before the expiration of the certification under section 20250HB1644PN1994 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 58A05(b) (relating to application and certification process).§ 58A05. Application and certification process.(a) Process.--An eligible person may file an application with the department on a form prescribed by the department to become a program participant. The department shall certify an eligible person who submits an application under this subsection as a program participant in accordance with subsection (b). Certification as a program participant shall be valid for a period of three years after the date of certification by the department unless the certification is voluntarily withdrawn or canceled under section 58A06 (relating to cancellation, expiration and voluntary withdrawal of certifications) before the expiration of the three-year period.(b) Certification.--The department shall certify an eligible person who submits an application under subsection (a) as a program participant if all of the following apply:(1) The eligible person designates the department as an agent for the purpose of receiving service of process.(2) The application contains the eligible person's actual address and telephone number where the eligible person can be contacted.(3) The application contains a list of all pending civil and criminal proceedings in which the eligible person is a victim, witness, plaintiff or defendant and, if applicable, the eligible person's involvement with the Pennsylvania Parole Board or a county office of probation and parole.(4) The application contains a statement signed by the eligible person affirming that the information provided by the eligible person is true to the best of the eligible person's information, knowledge and belief.20250HB1644PN1994 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The application contains a statement signed by the eligible person acknowledging that the eligible person has a continuing duty to notify the department of a change in the information provided to the department in accordance with this chapter for the duration of participation in the program.(6) The application contains the date, the eligible person's signature and the signature of any person who assisted in the preparation of the application.(c) Participation card.--Upon certifying an eligible person for program participation, the department shall issue a program participation card to the program participant with a substitute address.§ 58A06. Cancellation, expiration and voluntary withdrawal of certifications.(a) Cancellation.--The department shall cancel the certification of a program participant under section 58A05(b) (relating to application and certification process) if any of the following apply:(1) The program participant willingly provided false information on the application under section 58A05(a).(2) The program participant failed to notify the department within 10 days of a name change or an address change.(3) The program participant's mail is returned to the department as nondeliverable.(b) Expiration.--Certification as a program participant under section 58A05(b) shall be valid for a period of three years after the date of certification by the department. The department shall send a written notification of pending 20250HB1644PN1994 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expiration to a program participant's last known actual address no later than 30 days before the expiration of the certification.(c) Withdrawal.--A program participant may withdraw from participation in the program at any time by notifying the department in writing.(d) Effect of cancellation, expiration or withdrawal.--Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an eligible person may reapply for participation in the program.§ 58A07. Acceptance of substitute addresses by State and local government entities.A State or local government entity shall accept the substitute address designated on a valid program participation card issued to the program participant by the department as the program participant's address except if any of the following apply:(1) The State or local government entity has been granted a waiver under section 58A09 (relating to waiver process).(2) The program participant is any of the following:(i) A released offender complying with the requirements of the Pennsylvania Parole Board or a county office of probation and parole.(ii) A convicted sexual offender who has fulfilled the offender's sentence, but is required to register the offender's community residence as required under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders) or any similar registration requirement imposed by any other 20250HB1644PN1994 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jurisdiction.§ 58A08. Disclosure of actual addresses. The department may not disclose the actual address of a program participant except to any of the following:(1) A State or local government entity that has been granted a waiver by the department if the disclosure is made in accordance with section 58A09 (relating to waiver process).(2) A State or local government entity when disclosure is determined by the department to be required due to an emergency if the disclosure is made in accordance with section 58A10 (relating to emergency disclosure).(3) A person identified in an order of court of competent jurisdiction directing the department to disclose the program participant's actual address if the disclosure is made in accordance with the order.§ 58A09. Waiver process.(a) Requests for waivers.--A State or local government entity seeking the disclosure of a program participant's actual address shall make the request in writing on the State or local government entity's letterhead to the department and provide the department with all of the following information:(1) The name of the program participant.(2) A statement explaining the reason why the State or local government entity needs the program participant's actual address and a statement that the State or local government entity cannot meet its statutory or administrative obligations without disclosure of the program participant's actual address.(3) A statement of facts showing that other methods to 20250HB1644PN1994 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 locate the program participant or the program participant's actual address have been tried and have failed or that the other methods reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed.(4) A statement that the State or local government entity has adopted a procedure detailing the steps that the State or local government entity will take to protect the confidentiality of the program participant's actual address.(b) Notice to program participants.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (3), the department shall provide a program participant with notice of a request for a waiver under subsection (a). To the extent possible, the department shall afford the program participant with an opportunity to be heard regarding the request.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the department shall provide a program participant with a written notification whenever a request for a waiver under subsection (a) has been granted or denied under subsection (d).(3) The department may not provide a program participant with a notice or opportunity to be heard under paragraph (1) or (2) when the request for disclosure is made by a law enforcement agency conducting a criminal investigation involving alleged criminal conduct by the program participant or when providing notice to the program participant would jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation or the safety of law enforcement agency personnel.(c) Review of requests for waivers.--The department shall promptly conduct a review of a request for a waiver under subsection (a). In conducting the review, the department shall consider all information received under subsections (a) and (b) and any other appropriate information that the department deems 20250HB1644PN1994 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary.(d) Criteria for granting waivers.--The department shall grant a State or local government entity's request for a waiver under subsection (a) and release a program participant's actual address if all of the following apply:(1) The State or local government entity has a bona fide statutory or administrative need for the actual address.(2) The actual address will only be used for the purpose stated in the request.(3) Other methods to locate the program participant or the program participant's actual address have been tried and have failed or the other methods reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed.(4) The State or local government entity has adopted a procedure for protecting the confidentiality of the actual address of the program participant.(e) Forms of waivers.--Upon granting a request for waiver under subsection (d), the department shall provide the State or local government entity receiving the waiver with a form containing all of the following:(1) The program participant's actual address.(2) A statement detailing the permitted use of the actual address and the names or classes of persons permitted to have access to and use of the actual address.(3) A statement that the State or local government entity is required to limit access to and use of the actual address to the permitted use and persons specified under paragraph (2).(4) The date on which the waiver expires if the permitted use makes the expiration appropriate. After the 20250HB1644PN1994 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expiration of the waiver, the State or local government entity may not continue to maintain, use or have access to the actual address.(f) State or local government entity requirements.--A State or local government entity that is granted a request for a waiver under subsection (d) shall comply with all of the following:(1) Limit the use of the program participant's actual address to the purposes stated on the waiver.(2) Limit access to the program participant's actual address to the persons or classes of persons stated in the waiver.(3) Cease to use and dispose of the program participant's actual address upon the expiration of the waiver.(4) Except as otherwise stated in the waiver, maintain the confidentiality of the program participant's actual address.(g) Denial of requests for waivers.--Upon denial of a State or local government entity's request for a waiver under subsection (a), the department shall provide prompt written notification of the denial to the State or local government entity and state the specific reason for the denial.(h) Filing of exceptions.--A State or local government entity may file a written exception with the department no later than 15 days after a written notification is provided under subsection (g). In the written exception, the State or local government entity shall restate the information contained in the request for a waiver under subsection (a), state the grounds upon which the State or local government entity asserts that the 20250HB1644PN1994 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 request for a waiver should be granted and specifically respond to the department's reason for denying the request for a waiver.(i) Review of exceptions and determination.--Unless the State or local government entity agrees otherwise, the department shall make a final determination regarding the written exception under subsection (h) within 30 days after the date of the filing. Before making a final determination regarding the written exception, the department may request additional information from the State or local government entity or the program participant and conduct a hearing. If the final determination of the department is that the denial under subsection (g) is proper, the department shall provide the State or local government entity with a written notification of the final determination stating that the State or local government entity request has again been denied and the specific reason for the denial. If the final determination of the department is that the denial of the State or local government entity request for waiver has been improperly denied under subsection (g), the department shall grant the State or local government entity request for a waiver in accordance with this section. The final determination of the department under this subsection shall be the final order of the department.(j) Appeal of final determinations.--Within 30 days after notification that the department has made a final determination affirming the denial of the State or local government entity's request for a waiver under subsection (i), the State or local government entity may appeal the final determination in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(k) Records on appeal.--The record before a court of 20250HB1644PN1994 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 competent jurisdiction hearing an appeal under subsection (j) shall consist of the State or local government entity's request for a waiver under subsection (a), the department's written notification under subsections (g) and (i), the State or local government entity's written exception under subsection (g), the hearing transcript under subsection (g), if any, and the department's final determination under subsection (i).(l) Use of substitute addresses.--During a period of review of a request for a waiver under subsection (a), including an appeal under subsection (j), a State or local government entity shall, to the extent possible, accept and use a program participant's substitute address.(m) Written consent.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the department from granting a request for a waiver under subsection (a) to a State or local government entity upon receipt of a program participant's written consent to grant the request.§ 58A10. Emergency disclosure.(a) Establishment.--The department shall establish a system to respond to a request for an emergency disclosure that will provide for 24-hour access to a program participant's actual address.(b) Requests for emergency disclosures.--A State or local government entity may request that the department disclose a program participant's actual address through the system established under subsection (a). The department shall disclose the program participant's actual address if the disclosure:(1) will prevent physical harm to the program participant or the program participant's family member; or(2) is made to a law enforcement agency for law 20250HB1644PN1994 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement purposes and the circumstances warrant immediate disclosure.(c) Requirements for emergency disclosures.--Before disclosing a program participant's actual address under subsection (b), the department shall require all of the following:(1) Verification of the requester's identity and the requester's employment with a State or local government entity.(2) Verification of the stated reason for the request to adequately ensure that emergency disclosure is necessary.(3) Proof, to the satisfaction of the department, that other methods to locate the program participant or the program participant's actual address have been tried and have failed or the other methods reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed given the circumstances of the stated reason for the request.(4) That the program participant's actual address only be used by the requester or the State or local government entity to the extent necessary to respond to the stated reason for the request.(5) That the requester and the State or local government entity maintain the confidentiality of the actual address of the program participant.(6) That the requester and the State or local government entity agree to dispose of the program participant's actual address as soon as practicable after the circumstances surrounding the stated reason for the request no longer require an emergency disclosure.§ 58A11. Penalties.20250HB1644PN1994 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) False information.--A person who knowingly provides false information in regard to a material fact contained in an application made under section 58A05 (relating to application and certification process) shall be subject to termination from the program and to criminal penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(b) Access by fraud or misrepresentation.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a person who intentionally, knowingly or recklessly attempts to gain access to or gains access to a program participant's actual address by fraud or misrepresentation commits a misdemeanor of the second degree. A second or subsequent violation of this paragraph shall be graded as a felony of the third degree.(2) A first offense under paragraph (1) shall be graded as a felony of the third degree if the offense is committed by any person who has previously been convicted of a crime of violence involving the program participant under paragraph (1) or the program participant's family or household members as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions), including any of the following:(i) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2701 (relating to simple assault).(ii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).(iii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person).(iv) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709 (relating to harassment).(v) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking).(vi) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation).(vii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).20250HB1644PN1994 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(ix) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(x) An offense that resulted in relief under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4954 (relating to protective orders).(xi) An offense that resulted in relief under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 (relating to relief).(c) Unauthorized disclosures or uses.--A person who lawfully obtains a program participant's actual address due to a written exception under section 58A09(h) (relating to waiver process) and who subsequently discloses or uses the actual address in a manner not authorized by this chapter commits a summary offense.§ 58A12. Civil immunity.Except for gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct, the department, a law enforcement agency or an agent, contractor or employee of the department or the law enforcement agency, shall be immune from civil liability in an action arising in relation to the provisions of this chapter.§ 58A13. Guidelines and regulations.(a) Guidelines.--The department shall adopt guidelines to implement this chapter and submit the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The guidelines shall not be subject to any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 20250HB1644PN1994 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Regulations.--No later than July 1, 2027, the department shall promulgate regulations to replace the guidelines under subsection (a).(c) Expiration.--The guidelines under subsection (a) shall take effect 180 days after the date of publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall expire on the date when the regulations take effect under subsection (b), or July 1, 2028, whichever is earlier.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1644PN1994 - 17 - 12345678910111213